Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 7. Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust.

Sec. 13.38.800.
Mandatory disbursements from income.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income:

interest, except interest on taxes described in AS

13.38.810(a)(7)

;

ordinary repairs;

real estate and other regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal;

recurring premiums on fire or other insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.810.
Mandatory disbursements from principal.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:

extraordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income;

extraordinary repairs;

compensation for legal services to the trustee;

expenses in connection with accountings and judicial or other proceedings, including proceedings to construe, modify, or reform the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

payments on the principal of a trust debt;

premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in AS

13.38.800

(4) if the trust is the owner and beneficiary;

estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including interest and penalties, apportioned to the trust;

disbursements related to environmental matters, including

reclamation;

assessing environmental conditions;

remedying and removing environmental contamination;

monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances;

preventing future releases of substances;

collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of those activities;

penalties imposed under environmental statutes or regulations and other payments made to comply with those statutes or regulations;

statutory or common law claims by third parties;

defending claims based on environmental matters.

If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the obligation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.820.
Discretionary allocation of expenses.

Subject to AS

13.38.800

and

13.38.810

, a trustee may, in the trustee’s discretion, allocate to income or principal or partly to each ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including the compensation of the trustee and of a person providing investment advisory, custodial, or income tax return preparation services to the trustee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.830.
Transfers to principal for depreciation.

A trustee may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation. However, a trustee may not transfer any amount for depreciation

of that portion of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or enjoyment of a beneficiary;

during the administration of a decedent’s estate; or

under this section if the trustee is accounting under AS

13.38.620

for the business or activity in which the asset is used.

An amount transferred to principal is not required to be held as a separate fund.

In this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.840.
Transfers from income to reimburse principal.

A trustee may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or to provide a reserve for future disbursements if the trustee makes or expects to make a disbursement from principal that is allocable to income under AS

13.38.800

or

13.38.820

and that is paid from principal because it is unusually large, or is made to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances, leasehold improvements, and broker’s commissions.

If the asset whose ownership gives rise to the disbursements becomes subject to a successive income interest after an income interest ends, a trustee may continue to transfer amounts from income to principal as provided in (a) of this section.

This section does not apply to the extent the trustee has been or expects to be reimbursed by a third party.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.850.
Income taxes.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income shall be paid from income.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal shall be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust’s share of an entity’s taxable income shall be paid proportionately from

income, to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to income; and

principal, to the extent that

receipts from the entity are allocated to principal; and

the trust’s share of the entity’s taxable income exceeds the total receipts described in (1) of this subsection and (A) of this paragraph.

For the purposes of this section, receipts allocated to principal or income shall be reduced by the amount distributed to a beneficiary from principal or income for which the trust receives a deduction in calculating the tax.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.38.860.
Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

A trustee may make adjustments between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries that arise from

an election or decision that the trustee makes regarding tax matters;

an income tax or any other tax that is imposed on the trustee or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving the trust or distribution from the trust; or

the ownership by a trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the trust or a beneficiary.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)